Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [13.891] RESTORATIVE PRACTICE PARTICIPANT DATA. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "restorative practice participant" has the meaning given in section 595.02, subdivision 1b, paragraph (a), clause (2). new text end new text begin (b) Data collected, created, or maintained by a government entity that identifies an individual as a restorative practice participant is private data on individuals but may be disclosed for the purposes described in section 595.02, subdivision 1b, paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (3), or paragraph (c). This section does not apply to personnel data, as defined in section 13.43, subdivision 1, or to an individual who receives payment to facilitate a restorative practice, as defined in section 142A.76, subdivision 1. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.76, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Report. By February 15 of each year, the director shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over public safety, human services, and education, on the work of the Office of Restorative Practices, any grants issued pursuant to this section, and the status of local restorative practices initiatives in the state that were reviewed in the previous year.new text begin The status report should include information provided by the grantees on their program's impact on recidivism, public safety, and local financial investments in restorative practices. Grantees must provide this information to the Office of Restorative Practices by November 15 of each year.new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 595.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Inadmissibility; exceptions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) "restorative practice" has the meaning given in section 142A.76, subdivision 1; and new text end new text begin (2) "restorative practice participant" means a facilitator, a person who has caused harm, a person who has been harmed, a community member, and any other person attending a restorative practice. new text end new text begin (b) Statements made or documents offered in the course of a restorative practice are not subject to discovery or admissible as evidence in a civil or criminal proceeding. This paragraph does not apply: new text end new text begin (1) to statements or documents that are the subject of a report made pursuant to section 626.557 or chapter 260E; new text end new text begin (2) if a restorative practice participant reasonably believed that disclosure of a statement or document was necessary to prevent reasonably certain death, great bodily harm, or commission of a crime; or new text end new text begin (3) if the statement or document constitutes evidence of professional misconduct by a restorative practice participant acting in the capacity of their professional or occupational license. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), if a court orders a person who caused harm to participate in a restorative practice, a person overseeing the restorative practice may disclose information necessary to demonstrate whether the person who caused harm participated as ordered. new text end new text begin (d) Evidence that is otherwise admissible or subject to discovery does not become inadmissible or protected from discovery solely because it was discussed or used in a restorative practice. new text end